en: Fresh Jerusalem artichoke
fr: Topinambour frais
nl: Verse aardperen

en: Parsnip
fr: Panais
hr: Pastrnjak
ja: パースニップ
nl: Pastinaken, Pastinaak

en: Fresh parsnip
fr: Panais frais
nl: Verse pastinaken, Verse pastinaak

en: Cooked parsnip
fr: Panais cuits
nl: Gekookte pastinaken

en: Frozen parsnip
fr: Panais surgelés

en: Cooked red kidney beans
fr: Haricots rouges cuits
hr: Kuhani crveni grah
nl: Gekookte rode kidneybonen, Gekookte rode kidney bonen

en: Vegetable rods
ca: Verdures allargades
de: Stangengemüse
es: Verduras de tallo
fr: Légumes tiges
hr: Biljne šipke
it: Ortaggi da fusto
nl: Stengelgroenten

en: Leaf vegetables
ca: Verdures de fulla verda
de: Blattgemüse
es: Verduras de hoja
fi: lehtivihannekset
fr: Légumes-feuilles, Légume-feuille
hr: Lisnato povrće
hu: Leveles zöldségek
it: Verdure a foglia
ja: 葉菜, 葉物, 葉野菜, 菜っ葉
nl: Bladgroenten
pl: Warzywa liściaste
ru: Листовые овощи

en: Salsifis, Salsify
fr: Salsifis
nl: Schorseneren, Schorseneer

en: Fresh salsify
fr: Salsifis frais
nl: Verse schorseneren, Verse schorseneer

en: Cooked salsify
fr: Salsifis cuits
nl: Gekookte schorseneren, Gekookte schorseneer

en: Black salsify
bg: Черен корен
fr: Salsifis noirs
hr: Crni salsify

en: Artichokes
bg: Артишок
ca: Escarxofa, carxofa
de: Artischocken
es: Alcachofas
fi: artisokat
fr: Artichauts, artichaut
hr: Artičoke
it: Carciofi
ja: アーティチョーク
la: Cynara scolymus
nl: Artisjokken
ru: Артишоки
tr: Enginar

en: Artichoke hearts
ca: Cors d'escarxofa, Cors de carxofa
de: Artischockenherzen
es: Corazones de alcachofas
fi: artisokan sydämet
fr: Coeurs d'artichauts, Fonds d'artichauts
hr: Srca artičoke
it: Cuori di carciofo
nl: Artisjokharten

en: Cooked globe artichoke
fr: Artichaut cuit
nl: Gekookte artisjok

en: Fresh artichokes, Artichoke globe
fr: Artichauts frais
nl: Verse artisjokken

en: Frozen artichoke bottom
fr: Fonds d'artichaut surgelés
nl: Diepvriesartisjokharten, Diepvriesartisjokbodems

en: Asparagus
bg: Аспержи
ca: Espàrrecs
de: Spargel
es: Espárragos
fi: parsa
fr: Asperges, asperge
he: אספרגוס
hr: Šparoga
it: Asparagi
ja: アスパラガス
la: Asparagus officinalis
nl: Asperges
pl: Szparagi
pt: Espargos
ru: Спаржа

en: Asparagus heads
es: Esperragos (yemas), Yemas de esparragos
fr: Pointes d'asperges
nl: Aspergekopjes

en: Miniature asparagus
fr: Asperges miniatures
hr: Minijaturne šparoge
nl: Mini asperges